Videos: 190 Sec

Google Privacy Policy

When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.

This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
Effective January 22, 2019 | Archived versions | Download PDF

We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:

    Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
    Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
    Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads and embedded Google Maps

You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web privately using Chrome in Incognito mode. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control what we collect and how your information is used.

To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for key terms. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can contact us.
Information Google collects

We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services

We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which ads you’ll find most useful, the people who matter most to you online, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.

When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with unique identifiers tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using. This helps us do things like maintain your language preferences across browsing sessions.

When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as personal information.
Things you create or provide to us

When you create a Google Account, you provide us with personal information that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a phone number or payment information to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to receive updates about our services.

We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services. This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices

We collect information about the apps, browsers, and devices you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.

The information we collect includes unique identifiers, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including IP address, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and referrer URL of your request.

We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an Android device with Google apps, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your device type, carrier name, crash reports, and which apps you've installed.
Your activity

We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:

    Terms you search for
    Videos you watch
    Views and interactions with content and ads
    Voice and audio information when you use audio features
    Purchase activity
    People with whom you communicate or share content
    Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
    Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account

If you use our services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages, we may collect telephony log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types of calls.

You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.

Go to Google Account
Your location information

We collect information about your location when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions for your weekend getaway or showtimes for movies playing near you.

Your location can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy by:

    GPS
    IP address
    Sensor data from your device
    Information about things near your device, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices

The types of location data we collect depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can turn your Android device’s location on or off using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on Location History if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices.

In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, including marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse. We also receive information from advertisers to provide advertising and research services on their behalf.

We use various technologies to collect and store information, including cookies, pixel tags, local storage, such as browser web storage or application data caches, databases, and server logs.
Why Google collects data

We use data to build better services

We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services

We use your information to deliver our services, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services

We also use your information to ensure our services are working as intended, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to make improvements to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services

We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads

We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results. For example, Security Checkup provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.

Depending on your settings, we may also show you personalized ads based on your interests. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see an ad for sports equipment when you’re browsing a site that shows ads served by Google. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings.

    We don’t show you personalized ads based on sensitive categories, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
    We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.

Go to Ad Settings
Measure performance

We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites that use Google Analytics, Google and a Google Analytics customer may link information about your activity from that site with activity from other sites that use our ad services.
Communicate with you

We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public

We use information to help improve the safety and reliability of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.

We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use algorithms to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.

We may combine the information we collect among our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings, your activity on other sites and apps may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.

If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.

We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls

You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used

This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the Privacy Checkup, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our Product Privacy Guide.

Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information

When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.

We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your Google Account includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls

Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, you can turn on Location History if you want traffic predictions for your daily commute, or you can save your YouTube Watch History to get better video suggestions.

Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings

Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.

Go to Ad Settings
About you

Control what others see about you across Google services.

Go to About You
Shared endorsements

Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.

Go to Shared Endorsements
Information you share

Control whom you share information with through your account on Google+.

Go to Information You Share
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity

My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.

Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard

Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.

Go to Dashboard
Your personal information

Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.

Go to Personal Info

When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:

    Signed-out search personalization: Choose whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
    YouTube settings: Pause and delete your YouTube Search History and your YouTube Watch History.
    Ad Settings: Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.

Exporting, removing & deleting your information

You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.

Export your data

You can also request to remove content from specific Google services based on applicable law.

To delete your information, you can:

    Delete your content from specific Google services
    Search for and then delete specific items from your account using My Activity
    Delete specific Google products, including your information associated with those products
    Delete your entire Google Account

Delete your information

And finally, Inactive Account Manager allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.

There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:

    Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a cookie in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services rely on cookies to function properly, for things like remembering your language preferences.
    Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can modify location settings on your Android device.

Sharing your information
When you share your information

Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.

When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing a song in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting.
When Google shares your information

We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent

We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you use Google Home to make a reservation through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any sensitive personal information.
With domain administrators

If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services (like G Suite), your domain administrator and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:

    Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
    View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
    Change your account password
    Suspend or terminate your account access
    Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
    Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings

For external processing

We provide personal information to our affiliates and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help us with customer support.
For legal reasons

We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation, or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:

    Meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our Transparency Report.
    Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
    Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
    Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public as required or permitted by law.

We may share non-personally identifiable information publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to show trends about the general use of our services. We also allow specific partners to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.

If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure

We build security into our services to protect your information

All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.

We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:

    We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
    We offer a range of security features, like Safe Browsing, Security Checkup, and 2 Step Verification to help you protect your account
    We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
    We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.

Exporting & deleting your information

You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time

You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.

Export your data

To delete your information, you can:

    Delete your content from specific Google services
    Search for and then delete specific items from your account using My Activity
    Delete specific Google products, including your information associated with those products
    Delete your entire Google Account

Delete your information

In some cases, we retain data for limited periods when it needs to be kept for legitimate business or legal purposes. You can read about Google’s data retention periods, including how long it takes us to delete your information.

We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators

We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers

We maintain servers around the world and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the transfer of data, such as the EU-US and Swiss-US Privacy Shield Frameworks.

When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
About this policy
When this policy applies

This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its affiliates, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.

This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:

    The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
    Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites that may include Google services, be displayed to you in search results, or be linked from our services

Changes to this policy

We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to archived versions for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services

The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:

    Chrome & the Chrome Operating System
    Play Books
    Payments
    Fiber
    Google Fi
    G Suite for Education
    YouTube Kids
    Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)

Other useful resources

The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.

    Your Google Account is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
    Privacy Checkup guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
    Google’s safety center helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
    Privacy & Terms provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
    Technologies includes more information about:
        How Google uses cookies
        Technologies used for Advertising
        How Google uses pattern recognition to recognize things like faces in photos
        How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services

        Link refernces:-
        Key terms

    Affiliates
    Algorithm
    Application data cache
    Browser web storage
    Cookies
    Device
    Google Account
    Referrer URL
    IP address
    Non-personally identifiable information
    Personal information
    Pixel tag
    Sensitive personal information
    Server logs
    Unique identifiers

Affiliates

An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the companies providing business services in the EU.
Algorithm

A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache

An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage

Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies

A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about how Google uses cookies and how Google uses data, including cookies, when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Device

A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account

You may access some of our services by signing up for a Google Account and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
Referrer URL

A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
IP address

Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet.
Non-personally identifiable information

This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information

This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag

A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Sensitive personal information

This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs

Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.

A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:

123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Firefox 1.0.7; Windows NT 5.1 -
740674ce2123e969

    123.45.67.89 is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
    25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 is the date and time of the query.
    http://www.google.com/search?q=cars is the requested URL, including the search query.
    Firefox 1.0.7; Windows NT 5.1 is the browser and operating system being used.
    740674ce2123a969 is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).

Unique identifiers

A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.

Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about how Google uses cookies.

On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be managed in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.


------------------

Google Chrome Privacy Notice
Last modified: March 12, 2019
View archived versions:

Learn how to control the information that's collected, stored, and shared when you use the Google Chrome browser on your computer or mobile device, Chrome OS, and when you enable Safe Browsing in Chrome. Although this policy describes features that are specific to Chrome, any personal information that is provided to Google or stored in your Google Account will be used and protected in accordance with the Google Privacy Policy, as changed from time to time. Google’s retention policy describes how and why Google retains data.

If Google Play apps have been enabled on your Chromebook, the use and protection of information collected by Google Play or the Android operating system is governed by the Google Play Terms of Service and Google Privacy Policy. Details specific to Chrome are provided in this Notice where relevant.
Details about the Privacy Notice

In this Privacy Notice, we use the term "Chrome" to refer to all the products in the Chrome family listed above. If there are differences in our policy between products, we'll point them out. We change this Privacy Notice from time to time.

"Beta," "Dev," or "Canary" versions of Chrome let you test new features still being created in Chrome. This Privacy Notice applies to all versions of Chrome, but might not be up-to-date for features still under development.

For step-by-step guides to managing your privacy preferences, read this overview of Chrome's privacy controls.
Table of contents:

    Browser modes
    Managing users in Chrome
    Safe Browsing practices
    Privacy practices of using apps, extensions, themes, services, and other add-ons
    More information

Browser modes

You don't need to provide any personal information to use Chrome, but Chrome has different modes that you can use to change or improve your browsing experience. Privacy practices are different depending on the mode that you're using.
Basic browser mode

The basic browser mode stores information locally on your system. This information might include:

    Browsing history information. For example, Chrome stores the URLs of pages that you visit, a cache of text, images and other resources from those pages, and, if the network actions prediction feature is turned on, a list of some of the IP addresses linked from those pages.

    Personal information and passwords, to help you fill out forms or sign in to sites you visit.

    A list of permissions that you have granted to websites.

    Cookies or data from websites that you visit.

    Data saved by add-ons.

    A record of what you downloaded from websites.

You can manage this information in several ways:

    You can delete your browsing history information.

    You can manage or delete stored browsing data from the Cookies and Site Data dialog.

    You can stop Chrome from accepting cookies. Learn more.

    You can review stored passwords in Chrome settings. Learn more.

    You can view and manage your stored Autofill information. Learn more.

The personal information that Chrome stores won't be sent to Google unless you choose to store that data in your Google Account by turning on sync, or, in the case of payment cards and billing information, choosing specific payment card and billing information to store in your Google Payments account. Learn More.
How Chrome handles your information

Information for website operators. Sites that you visit using Chrome will automatically receive standard log information, including your system’s IP address and data from cookies. In general, the fact that you use Chrome to access Google services, such as Gmail, does not cause Google to receive any additional personally identifying information about you. On Google websites and other websites that opt in, if Chrome detects signs that you are being actively attacked by someone on the network (a "man in the middle attack"), Chrome may send information about that connection to Google or the website you visited to help determine the extent of the attack and how the attack functions. Google provides participating website owners with reports about attacks occurring on their sites.

Prerendering. To load web pages faster, Chrome has a setting that can look up the IP addresses of links on a web page and open network connections. Sites and Android apps can also ask the browser to preload the pages you might visit next. Preloading requests from Android apps are controlled by the same setting as Chrome-initiated predictions. But preloading instructions from sites are always performed, regardless of whether Chrome’s network prediction feature is enabled. If prerendering is requested, whether by Chrome or by a site or app, the preloaded site is allowed to set and read its own cookies just as if you had visited it, even if you don’t end up visiting the prerendered page. Learn more.

Location. To get more geographically relevant information, Chrome gives you the option to share your location with a site. Chrome won't allow a site to access your location without your permission; however, on mobile devices, Chrome automatically shares your location with your default search engine if the Chrome app has permission to access your location and you haven’t blocked geolocation for the associated web site. Chrome uses Google Location Services to estimate your location. The information that Chrome sends to Google Location Services may include:

    The Wi-Fi routers closest to you
    Cell IDs of the cell towers closest to you
    The strength of your Wi-Fi or cell signal
    The IP address that is currently assigned to your device

Google doesn't have control over third-party websites or their privacy practices, so be cautious when sharing your location with a website.

Updates. Chrome periodically sends information to Google to check for updates, get connectivity status, validate the current time, and estimate the number of active users.

Search features. If you are signed in to a Google site and Google is your default search engine, searches you perform using the address bar in Chrome are stored in your Google Account.

Search prediction service. To help you find information faster, Chrome uses the prediction service provided by your default search engine to offer likely completions to the text you are typing. When you search using the address bar in Chrome, the characters you type (even if you haven’t hit "enter" yet) are sent to your default search engine. If Google is your default search engine, predictions are based on your own search history, topics related to what you’re typing and what other people are searching for. Learn more. Predictions can also based on your browsing history. Learn more.

Navigation assistance. When you can’t connect to a web page, you can get suggestions for alternative pages similar to the one you're trying to reach. In order to offer you suggestions, Chrome sends Google the URL of the page you're trying to reach.

Autofill and password management. In order to improve Chrome’s Autofill and password management services, Chrome sends Google limited, anonymous information about the web forms that you encounter or submit while Autofill or password management is enabled, including a hashed URL of the web page and details of the form's structure. Learn more.

Payments. When you are signed into Chrome with your Google account, Chrome may offer to save payment cards and related billing information to your Google Payments account. Chrome may also offer you the option of filling payment cards from your Google Payments account into web forms. If you have cards saved locally in Chrome, Chrome may prompt you to save them to your Google Payments account. If you use a payment card from your Google Payments account or choose to save your payment card in your Google Payments account for future use, Chrome will collect information about your computer and share it with Google Pay to protect you from fraud and provide the service. If supported by the merchant, Chrome will also allow you to pay using Google Pay.

Language. In order to customize your browsing experience based on the languages that you prefer to read, Chrome will keep a count of the most popular languages of the sites you visit. This language preference will be sent to Google to customize your experience in Chrome. If you have turned on Chrome sync, this language profile will be associated with your Google Account and, if you include Chrome history in your Google Web & App Activity, it may be used to personalize your experience in other Google products. View Activity Controls.

Web Apps on Android. On Android devices, if you select "add to homescreen" for a website that has been optimized for fast, reliable performance on mobile devices, then Chrome will use a Google server to create a native Android package for that website on your device. The Android package allows you to interact with the web app as you would with an Android app. For example, the web app will appear in your list of installed apps. Learn more.

Usage statistics and crash reports. By default, usage statistics and crash reports are sent to Google to help us improve our products. Usage statistics contain information such as preferences, button clicks, and memory usage. In general, usage statistics do not include web page URLs or personal information, but, if you have turned on "Make searches and browsing better / Sends URLs of pages you visit to Google", then Chrome usage statistics include information about the web pages you visit and your usage of them. For example, we may collect statistics to identify web pages that load slowly. We use this information to improve our products and services, and to give web developers insight into improving their pages. Crash reports contain system information at the time of the crash, and may contain web page URLs or personal information, depending on what was happening at the time the crash report was triggered. We may share aggregated, non-personally identifiable information publicly and with partners — like publishers, advertisers or web developers. You can change whether usage statistics and crash reports are sent to Google at any time. Learn more. If Google Play apps are enabled on your Chromebook and Chrome usage statistics are enabled, then Android diagnostic and usage data is also sent to Google.

Media licenses. Some websites encrypt media to protect against unauthorized access and copying. For HTML5 sites, this key exchange is done using the Encrypted Media Extensions API. In the process of allowing access to this media, session identifiers and licenses may be stored locally. These identifiers can be cleared by the user in Chrome using Clear Browsing Data with "Cookies and other site data" selected. For sites that use Adobe Flash Access, Chrome will provide a unique identifier to content partners and websites. The identifier is stored on your system. You can deny this access in the settings under Content Settings, Protected content, and reset the ID using Clear Browsing Data with "Cookies and other site data" selected. If you access protected content in Chrome on Android, or access higher quality or offline content on Chrome OS, a content provider may ask Chrome for a certificate to verify the eligibility of the device. Your device will share a site specific identifier with the website to certify that its cryptographic keys are protected by Chrome hardware. Learn more.

Other Google services. This notice describes the Google services that are enabled by default in Chrome. In addition, Chrome may offer other Google web services. For example, if you encounter a page in a different language, Chrome will offer to send the text to Google for translation. You will be notified of your options for controlling these services when you first use them. You can find more information in the Chrome Privacy Whitepaper.
Identifiers in Chrome

Chrome includes a number of unique and non-unique identifiers necessary to power features and functional services. For example, if you use push messaging, an identifier is created in order to deliver notices to you. Where possible, we use non-unique identifiers and remove identifiers when they are no longer needed. Additionally, the following identifiers help us develop, distribute, and promote Chrome, but are not directly related to a Chrome feature.

    Installation tracking. Each copy of the Windows desktop version of the Chrome browser includes a temporary randomly generated installation number that is sent to Google when you install and first use Chrome. This temporary identifier helps us estimate the number of installed browsers, and will be deleted the first time Chrome updates. The mobile version of Chrome uses a variant of the device identifier on an ongoing basis to track the number of installations of Chrome.

    Promotion tracking. In order to help us track the success of promotional campaigns, Chrome generates a unique token that is sent to Google when you first run and use the browser. In addition, if you received or reactivated your copy of the desktop version of the Chrome browser as part of a promotional campaign and Google is your default search engine, then searches from the omnibox will include a non-unique promotional tag. All mobile versions of the Chrome browser also include a non-unique promotional tag with searches from the omnibox. Chrome OS may also send a non-unique promotional tag to Google periodically (including during initial setup) and when performing searches with Google. Learn more.

    Field trials. We sometimes conduct limited tests of new features. Chrome includes a seed number that is randomly selected on first run to assign browsers to experiment groups. Experiments may also be limited by country (determined by your IP address), operating system, Chrome version, and other parameters. A list of field trials that are currently active on your installation of Chrome is included in all requests sent to Google. Learn more.

Sign-in and Sync Chrome modes

You also have the option to use the Chrome browser while signed in to your Google Account, with or without sync enabled.

Sign in on Desktop. On desktop versions of Chrome, signing into or out of any Google web service, like google.com, signs you into or out of Chrome. You can turn this off in settings. Learn more. If you are signed in to your Google Account on desktop, Chrome may offer to save your payment cards and related billing information to your Google Payments account. This personal information will be used and protected in accordance with the Google Privacy Policy.

Sync. When you sign in to the Chrome browser or a Chromebook and enable sync with your Google Account, your personal information is saved in your Google Account on Google's servers so you may access it when you sign in and sync to Chrome on other computers and devices. This personal information will be used and protected in accordance with the Google Privacy Policy. This type of information can include:

    Browsing history
    Bookmarks
    Tabs
    Passwords and Autofill information
    Other browser settings, like installed extensions

Sync is only enabled if you choose. Learn More. To customize the specific information that you have enabled to sync, use the "Settings" menu. Learn more. You can see the amount of Chrome data stored for your Google Account and manage it on the Data from Chrome sync Dashboard. On the Dashboard, except for Google Accounts created through Family Link, you can also disable sync and delete all the associated data from Google’s servers. Learn more. For Google Accounts created in Family Link, sign-in is required and sync cannot be disabled because it provides parent management features, such as website restrictions. However, children with Family Link accounts can still delete their data and disable synchronization of most data types. Learn More. The Privacy Notice for Google Accounts created in Family Link applies to Chrome sync data stored in those accounts.
How Chrome handles your synced information

When you enable sync with your Google Account, we use your browsing data to improve and personalize your experience within Chrome. You can also personalize your experience on other Google products, by allowing your Chrome history to be included in your Google Web & App Activity. Learn more.

You can change this setting on your Account History page or manage your private data whenever you like. If you don't use your Chrome data to personalize your Google experience outside of Chrome, Google will only use your Chrome data after it's anonymized and aggregated with data from other users. Google uses this data to develop new features, products, and services, and to improve the overall quality of existing products and services. If you would like to use Google's cloud to store and sync your Chrome data but you don't want Google to access the data, you can encrypt your synced Chrome data with your own sync passphrase. Learn more.
Incognito mode and guest mode

You can limit the information Chrome stores on your system by using incognito mode or guest mode. In these modes, Chrome won't store certain information, such as:

    Basic browsing history information like URLs, cached page text, or IP addresses of pages linked from the websites you visit
    Snapshots of pages that you visit
    Records of your downloads, although the files you download will still be stored elsewhere on your computer or device

How Chrome handles your incognito or guest information

Cookies. Chrome won't share existing cookies with sites you visit in incognito or guest mode. Sites may deposit new cookies on your system while you are in these modes, but they'll only be stored and transmitted until you close the last incognito or guest window.

Browser configuration changes. When you make changes to your browser configuration, like bookmarking a web page or changing your settings, this information is saved. These changes are not affected by incognito or guest mode.

Permissions. Permissions you grant in incognito mode are not saved to your existing profile.

Profile information. In incognito mode, you will still have access to information from your existing profile, such as suggestions based on your browsing history and saved passwords, while you are browsing. In guest mode, you can browse without seeing information from any existing profiles.
Managing Users in Chrome
Managing users for personal Chrome use

You can set up personalized versions of Chrome for users sharing one device or computer. Note that anyone with access to your device can view all the information in all profiles. To truly protect your data from being seen by others, use the built-in user accounts in your operating system. Learn more.
Managing users on Chrome for Enterprise

Some Chrome browsers or Chromebooks are managed by a school or company. In that case, the administrator has the ability to apply policies to the browser or Chromebook. Chrome contacts Google to check for these policies when a user first starts browsing (except in guest mode). Chrome checks periodically for updates to policies.

An administrator can set up a policy for status and activity reporting for Chrome, including location information for Chrome OS devices. Your administrators may also have the ability to access, monitor, use or disclose data accessed from your managed device.
Safe Browsing practices

Google Chrome and certain third-party browsers, like some versions of Mozilla Firefox and Apple’s Safari, include Google's Safe Browsing feature. With Safe Browsing, information about suspicious websites is sent and received between the browser you are using and Google's servers.
How Safe Browsing works

Your browser contacts Google's servers periodically to download the most recent "Safe Browsing" list, which contains known phishing and malware sites. The most recent copy of the list is stored locally on your system. Google doesn't collect any account information or other personally identifying information as part of this contact. However, it does receive standard log information, including an IP address and cookies.

Each site you visit is checked against the Safe Browsing list on your system. If there's a match, your browser sends Google a hashed, partial copy of the site’s URL so that Google can send more information to your browser. Google cannot determine the real URL from this information. Learn more.

The following Safe Browsing features are specific to Chrome:

    Some versions of Chrome feature Safe Browsing technology that can identify potentially harmful sites and potentially dangerous file types not already known by Google. The full URL of the site or potentially dangerous file might also be sent to Google to help determine whether the site or file is harmful.

    Chrome uses Safe Browsing technology to scan your computer periodically, in order to detect unwanted software that prevents you from changing your settings or otherwise interferes with the security and stability of your browser. Learn more. If this kind of software is detected, Chrome might offer you the option to download the Chrome Cleanup Tool to remove it.

    You can choose to send additional data to help improve Safe Browsing when you access a site that appears to contain malware or when Chrome detects unwanted software on your computer. Learn more.

    If you use Chrome’s password manager, Safe Browsing checks with Google when you enter any saved password on an uncommon page to protect you from phishing attacks. Chrome does not send your passwords to Google as part of this protection. In addition, Safe Browsing protects your Google Account password. If you enter it on a likely phishing site, Chrome will prompt you to change your Google Account password. If you sync your browsing history, Chrome will also flag your Google Account as likely phished.

    You can always choose to disable the Safe Browsing feature within Chrome.

Privacy practices of apps, extensions, themes, services, and other add-ons

You can use apps, extensions, themes, services and other add-ons with Chrome, including some that may be preinstalled or integrated with Chrome. Add-ons developed and provided by Google may communicate with Google servers and are subject to the Google Privacy Policy unless otherwise indicated. Add-ons developed and provided by others are the responsibility of the add-on creators and may have different privacy policies.
Managing add-ons

Before installing an add-on, you should review the requested permissions. Add-ons can have permission to do various things, like:

    Store, access, and share data stored locally or in your Google Drive account
    View and access content on websites you visit
    Use notifications that are sent through Google servers

Chrome can interact with add-ons in a few different ways:

    Checking for updates
    Downloading and installing updates
    Sending usage indicators to Google about the add-ons

Some add-ons might require access to a unique identifier for digital rights management or for delivery of push messaging. You can disable the use of identifiers by removing the add-on from Chrome.

From time to time, Google might discover an add-on that poses a security threat, violates the developer terms for Chrome Web Store, or violates other legal agreements, laws, regulations, or policies. Chrome periodically downloads a list of these dangerous add-ons, in order to remotely disable or remove them from your system.
Server Log Privacy Information

Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These "server logs" typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.

Here is an example of a typical log entry for where the search is for "cars" looks like this, followed by a breakdown of its parts:

123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 - https://www.google.com/search?q=cars - Firefox 1.0.7; Windows NT 5.1 - 740674ce2123e969

    123.45.67.89 is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. D; depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.;
    25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 is the date and time of the query.;
    https://www.google.com/search?q=cars is the requested URL, including the search query.;
    Firefox 1.0.7; Windows NT 5.1 is the browser and operating system being used.;
    740674ce2123a969 is the unique cookie ID that was assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited a Google site. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve/s/he visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the user the next time theys/he visits Google from that particular computer).

More information

Information that Google receives when you use Chrome is used and protected under the Google Privacy Policy. Information that other website operators and add-on developers receive, including cookies, is subject to the privacy policies of those websites.

Google adheres to several self regulatory frameworks, including the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework. Learn more. The Google affiliate listed as provider of the Chrome service in the Google Chrome Terms of Service shall be the data controller responsible for your information and responsible for processing your information and complying with applicable privacy laws.
Key Terms
Cookies

A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about how Google uses cookies and how Google uses data, including cookies, when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google Account

You may access some of our services by signing up for a Google Account and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings. 

-------------------


About privacy on Google Play Books

January 23rd, 2018 | View archived version

The main Google Privacy Policy describes how we treat personal information when you use Google's products and services, including Google Play. Below, we describe privacy practices specific to books on Google Play. Note that “books” in this policy refers to ebooks on Google Play and does not include audiobooks or other formats.
Practices specific to Google Play Books

The privacy practices that are specific to books on Google Play are:

    To fulfill contractual commitments to rightsholders who license us books, we enforce certain security limits (for example, to prevent abusive sharing of purchased books and to enforce page view limits on some book previews), and we also enforce limits on the numbers of browsers or devices that can access an account during a given period of time. In order to enforce limits on numbers of devices, we will store the unique ID numbers of your devices on our servers. You can delete a device ID number when you wish to stop using that device.
    You will need to have a Google Account in order to purchase books because account information is necessary to provide access to users who bought the book. We limit the information (such as books titles) we provide to credit card companies, and enable you to delete purchased books from your Google Account. However, you will not be able to delete the record of your purchase transaction (including the title of the book) from your Google Payments account history.
    If you are part of a family group on Google Play and purchase books using a family payment method, your family manager will be responsible for these purchases and will therefore see a record of your books purchases made using the family payment method, including titles and genres. Although you will be able to delete purchased books from your Google Account, you will not be able to delete the family manager's records of the purchase transactions.
    In order to enable consistent reading position across devices and provide useful navigation within a book, we store the last five pages (only) in each book a user has viewed with the user's account. We also store pages viewed for security monitoring and/or if the user elects to use the Web History service.
    Special legal privacy protections for users may apply in cases where law enforcement or civil litigants ask Google for information about what books an individual user has looked at. Some jurisdictions have special "books laws" saying that this information is not available unless the person asking for it meets a special, high standard such as proving to a court that there is a compelling need for the information, and that this need outweighs the reader's interest in reading anonymously under the United States First Amendment or other applicable laws. Where these "books laws" exist and apply to books on Google Play, we will raise them. We will also continue our strong history of fighting for high standards to protect users, regardless of whether a particular "books law" applies. In addition, we are committed to notifying the affected user if we receive such a request that may lead to disclosure of their information; if we are permitted to do so by law and if we have an effective way to contact the user, we will seek to do so in time for the user to challenge the request.

For additional information about books on Google Play and privacy, please see our FAQ.
--------------


Google Payments Privacy Notice
Last modified September 23, 2018

The Google Privacy Policy describes how we treat personal information when you use Google's products and services. Google Payments is offered to Google Account holders and your use of it is subject to the Google Privacy Policy. In addition, this Privacy Notice describes Google privacy practices that are specific to Google Payments.

Your use of Google Payments is governed by the Google Payments Terms of Service, which describes in more detail the Services covered by this Privacy Notice. Capitalized terms not defined in this Google Payments Privacy Notice shall have the meaning ascribed to them in the Google Payments Terms of Service.

The Google Payments Privacy Notice applies to Services offered by Google LLC's wholly owned subsidiaries, including Google Payment Corp. ("GPC"). Please consult the Google Payments Terms of Service made available to you within the Service to learn the subsidiary offering the Service.
Information we collect

In addition to the information listed in the Google Privacy Policy we may also collect the following:

    Registration information - When you sign up for Google Payments, you are creating a Google Payments Account that is associated with your Google Account. Depending on the Google Payments services you use, in addition to the information listed in the Google Privacy Policy, you may be asked to provide the following information: Credit or debit card number and card expiration date, bank account number and expiration date, address, phone number, date of birth, social security number or taxpayer identification number (or some other government-issued identification number), and for sellers or businesses specifically, your business category and certain information about your sales or transaction volume. In some cases, we may also ask you to send us additional information or to answer additional questions to help verify your information. Finally, if you register a Carrier or Operator Billing Account, we will ask you to provide us with certain information about your Carrier or Operator account.
    Information obtained from third parties - We may obtain information about you from third parties, including third party verification services. This includes information arising from Google Payments transactions at merchant locations, information regarding your use of payment methods and your accounts issued by third parties that are linked to the Google Payments, the identity of your card issuer or financial institution, information regarding access to balances held in your Google Payments Account, information from a Carrier or Operator in connection with Carrier or Operator Billing, and consumer reports, as the term "consumer reports" is defined by the US Fair Credit Reporting Act.

    Also, for sellers, we may obtain information about you and your business from a credit bureau or a business information service.
    Transaction information - When you use Google Payments to conduct a transaction, we may collect information about the transaction, including: Date, time and amount of the transaction, the merchant's location and description, a description provided by the seller of the goods or services purchased, any photo you choose to associate with the transaction, the names and email addresses of the seller and buyer (or sender and recipient), the type of payment method used, your description of the reason for the transaction, and the offer associated with the transaction, if any.

How we use the information we collect

In addition to the uses listed in the Google Privacy Policy, we use the information you provide to us and to GPC or other of our subsidiaries, as well as information about you from third parties, in order to provide you with Google Payments for customer service purposes, and to protect you from fraud, phishing or other misconduct. Such information may also be used to assist third parties in the provision of products or services that you request from them. We also use the information to review your Google Payments Account to determine whether you continue to meet the terms of the account, to make decisions about your future Google Payments transactions, and for other legitimate business needs related to the Google Payments transactions initiated by you.

Your registration information is stored in association with your Google Account and your registration of a payment method will be stored on Google's servers. In addition, certain data elements may also be stored on your mobile device. We may retain the information you provide for extended periods of time for the purpose of complying with legal process and regulatory obligations.
Information we share

We will only share your personal information with other companies or individuals outside of Google in the following circumstances:

    As permitted under the Google Privacy Policy.
    As necessary to process your transaction and maintain your account.
    To complete your registration for a service provided by a third party.
    To inform a third party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google Payments account that can be used for making payment to that merchant.

For example, when you make a purchase or transaction using Google Payments, we make certain personal information about you available to the company or individual you purchase from or transact with. This includes sharing your personal information with the developer from whom you purchased when you use Google Payments to make a purchase on Google Play. When you add a third party form of payment to your Google Payments Account, we may exchange certain personal information about you, such as your name, profile image, email, IP and billing address, phone number, device info, location, and Google Account activity info, with the third party payment provider as necessary to provide the service.

When you visit a participating merchant site or app, the merchant can check whether you have a Google Payments account with an eligible form of payment that can be used to pay the merchant, in order to reduce the likelihood that you will see unusable features on sites or apps.

Any information you provide directly to a third party merchant, website or application is not covered by this privacy notice. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of merchants or other third parties with whom you choose to share your personal information directly. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any third party to whom you choose to share your personal information directly.

The information that we collect, including information obtained from third parties, is shared with our affiliates, meaning other companies owned and controlled by Google LLC. Our affiliates, which can be financial and nonfinancial entities, will use such information for their everyday business purposes.

We provide you with the right to opt out of certain sharing between GPC and its affiliates. Specifically, you may choose to opt out of:

    Sharing between GPC and its affiliates of information about your creditworthiness for their everyday business purposes; and/or,
    Our affiliates marketing their products or services to you based on your personal information that we collect and share with them. This information includes your account history with us.

You may also choose to opt out of Google LLC or its affiliates informing a third party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google Payments account that can be used for payment to that merchant.

If you choose to opt out, your choice will be effective until you tell us to change your choice.

If you don't want us to share personal information about your creditworthiness between GPC and its affiliates, or if you do not want our affiliates to use your personal information collected by us and shared with them to market to you, or if you do not want Google LLC or its affiliates to inform a third party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google Payments account that can be used for payment to that merchant, please indicate your preference by logging into your account, going to the Google Payments privacy settings page, and updating your preferences.

We will not share your personal information with anyone outside of GPC or with our affiliates except as described in this privacy notice. As explained above, Google Payments is a product offered to Google Account holders. Data you provide to Google LLC for the purpose of signing up for a Google Account is not affected by the opt-out provisions in this notice.
Information security

For more information about our security practices, please see the main Google Privacy Policy.

The security of your Google Payments Account depends on you keeping your account password(s), PINs, and other access information for the Service confidential. If you share your account information with a third party, he or she will have access to your account and your personal information.

It is your responsibility to control access to your mobile device and the Google Payments application on your device, including keeping your password(s) and/or PIN confidential and not sharing it with anyone. It is also your responsibility to alert Google or the relevant partner if you believe that the security of the information in the Google Payments application has been compromised.

© 2018 Google - Google Home Google Terms of Service Previous Privacy Notices

--------------------------------


Google Fiber Privacy Notice

Last modified: 2016-04-07 (view archived versions)

The Google Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google Inc. and its affiliates, including Google Fiber Inc. and Google Fiber North America Inc.

This Google Fiber Privacy Notice explains some important additional things we’d like you to know about information we collect when you visit Fiber websites or when you use Google Fiber services, such as Google Fiber TV, Google Fiber Internet, and Google Fiber Phone (we call these together “Fiber”), and how we use and share that information.
Additional information we collect

To sign up for Fiber, users will be asked to provide an existing Google Account or to create a new one. You may be asked to provide additional personal information, such as billing address, service address or location, and bank account information when you sign up for Fiber.

We may also obtain information about our Fiber users from outside sources for marketing purposes (such as commercially available demographic, geographic, or interest information).

We may have a record of whether third party permission was required to install Fiber equipment for a Fiber user, as well as the third party’s name and contact information.

In order to carry out a request to watch a pay-per-view program or other on-demand content, we may collect certain personal information, such as account or billing information and information about the product or service purchased.

During the initial provisioning or installation of Fiber services, and during any subsequent changes, updates or attempts to resolve issues you bring to our attention, we may access and collect technical information from or about televisions, set-top boxes, computer and network hardware and software, modems, phone boxes, or other systems or devices used in connection with Fiber.

When you use Google Fiber Phone services, we collect and maintain your call history (including calling party phone number, called party phone number, date, time and duration of call), voicemail greetings, voicemail messages, Short Message Service (SMS) messages, recorded conversations, and other data related to your account in order to provide the service to you.
How we use information we collect

The Google Privacy Policy explains how we use information we collect. Below is further information about how we use information collected from certain Fiber services.

Google Fiber TV: All information we collect about the use of Google Fiber TV (including use of programs and applications available through Google Fiber TV) may be associated with the Google Account being used for Google Fiber TV. (When information is associated with your Google Account, we treat it as personal information.) For more information about how this may impact your Google Account, visit our Policies Support page.

Google Fiber Internet: We use technical information collected from the use of Google Fiber Internet for network management, security or maintenance purposes and may associate this information with the Google Account you use for Fiber, but such information associated with the Google Account you use for Fiber will not be used by other Google properties without your consent. Other information from the use of Google Fiber Internet (such as URLs of websites visited or content of communications) will not be associated with the Google Account you use for Fiber, except with your consent or to meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.

Google Fiber Phone: All information we collect about your use of Google Fiber Phone may be associated with the Google Account being used for Google Fiber Phone. (Again, when information is associated with your Google Account, we treat it as personal information.) In addition to the uses listed in the Google Privacy Policy, and the article How Google Voice works, we use the information we collect to provide your service, bill you for your service, help you troubleshoot any issues you are experiencing, verify your identity, and protect you and Google Fiber from fraud, phishing or other misconduct. As described below, some of your Google Fiber Phone information is treated as CPNI and used in accordance with federal law.

This notice does not apply to the collection and use of information from other Google services (such as Gmail or Google Search) used while connected to Google Fiber Internet – such information will be treated in accordance with applicable Google policies and terms of service.
Information we share

We do not share personal information with companies, organizations and individuals outside of Google except in the circumstances (such as with your consent, with domain administrators, for external processing and for legal reasons) as more fully set out in the Google Privacy Policy.

If you use Google Fiber Phone, your phone number may be displayed to the person you’ve called. You can find out how to block your phone number from being displayed here. We may share non-personally identifiable information publicly and with our partners – like content providers, publishers, advertisers or connected sites.
Customer Proprietary Network Information

We take our duty to protect your Customer Proprietary Network Information (“CPNI”) very seriously. Federal law requires certain voice and Internet access providers, including interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service providers like Google Fiber Phone, to protect certain personal information that we generate or access in providing the services to you. CPNI for voice services includes, but is not limited to, call details, call location information, and information about the rates and features of the services that you use. CPNI does not include subscriber list information, such as your name, address, or phone number. We may use the information we collect about your use of Google Fiber Phone to send you information about the services in compliance with our obligations to protect your CPNI. Here are the ways we treat your CPNI associated with Google Fiber Phone:

    Securing your CPNI. We implement safeguards that are designed to protect your CPNI. We authenticate you with a password or other permissible means before we disclose any CPNI.

    Using CPNI without your additional approval is limited to specific purposes. By using the Google Fiber Phone services, you allow us to use, disclose, and permit access to your CPNI without your additional approval only for the following limited purposes:
        To provide and offer services and features among the category of services you’re purchasing from us. This includes using CPNI in the normal course of business, such as to enable billing, customer service, and troubleshooting.
        To protect our rights and property.
        To protect our users and other carriers from fraudulent, abusive, or unlawful uses of the services.
        To comply with applicable laws and legal process. For any other purpose permitted by federal law.

Except for these purposes, we will not use, disclose, or permit access to your CPNI associated with Google Fiber Phone without your additional approval.

------------------------------



    Google Fi products and services (“Services”) are provided by Google North America Inc. (“Google Fi” or “We”), located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, United States, a wholly owned subsidiary of Google LLC (“Google”).

    These Google Fi Terms of Service (“Terms”) include the language below, the Electronic Communications Policy, Network Policy, Privacy Notice, Acceptable Use Policy, Subscriber Information, and other policies that we make available to you at google.com/fi (“Google Fi Website”) or via our mobile application (“Google Fi Application”). Device purchases from Google Fi are also subject to the Terms of Sale for Devices, and if you choose to pay for a device monthly with Google Fi, the Pay Monthly Device Plan Terms and Conditions.

    If you sign up or use the Services, you agree to these Terms. By agreeing to these Terms, you represent that you are capable of entering into a legally binding agreement. Also, you agree that if you allow others to access or use the Services, you will be responsible for all activity on the Services, whether such activity is undertaken by you or someone else.

    For group plans on Google Fi (“Group Plans”), you understand and agree that depending on the role of each Group Plan user, the user will have certain access and ability to manage accounts under the Group Plan. The creator of the Group Plan or the user later authorized as the owner of the Group Plan (“Owner”) may authorize users to be managers of the Group Plan (“Managers”). The Owner and Managers can see activity and manage accounts for all users of the Group Plan, including adding, pausing, and canceling accounts and setting data limits. Each user of the Group Plan (“Member”) can manage their own account within the limits set by the Owner and Managers, including adding devices, pausing and canceling their account, and transferring their phone number(s). If you are the Owner, you agree to be responsible for all activities and charges associated with the Group Plan, including charges for all users and devices under the Group Plan. If you are not the Owner, you understand and agree that your access to the Services depends upon the Owner’s compliance with these Terms. You must be at least eighteen years old to be the user of an individual account or the Owner or a Manager of a Group Plan with multiple accounts, and the Owner and Managers can see such eligibility for all users in Group Plan settings.
    Communicating with Us

    We may be required to provide certain disclosures, notices and communications (collectively “Communications”) to you in written form as part of the Services. You agree and consent to receive electronically all Communications that we may provide you in connection with your Google Fi account and your use of the Services. Please see the Electronic Communications Policy for more information.
    Google Account

    You must have an active Google Account to use the Services, and we will associate your Google Fi account with your Google Account. If you do not already have a Google Account at the time that you sign up for the Services, you will be required to create one. Your Google Account is subject to the Google Terms of Service. Please be aware that any suspension or termination of your Google Account may cause your Google Fi account to also be suspended or terminated.
    Using the Services

    In order to use the Services, you must subscribe to an active voice service plan and keep your Google Fi account in good standing. An account is in good standing when all charges for the Services that are due are paid in full and your designated payment method for the Services is valid. For more information about the Google Fi services and charges, please see the Subscription Information.

    The Services are offered only to residents of the United States. The Services must be primarily used in the United States and are not intended for extended international use. Further, the Services are designed for use predominantly within our network. If your usage outside our network is excessive, abnormally high, or cause us to incur too much cost, we may, at our option and sole discretion, suspend your Google Fi account, terminate your service, or limit your use of roaming.

    You agree not to misuse the Services, which includes using the Services for purposes that are illegal, are improper, infringe the rights of others, or adversely impact others’ enjoyment of the Services. The Services are intended for personal use only, and you may not resell the Services directly or indirectly, except as explicitly approved by us in writing. Please see the Acceptable Use Policy for more information, including examples of misuse.

    Using the Services does not give you ownership of any intellectual property rights in our Services or the content you access. You may not use content you access using the Services unless you obtain permission from its owner or are otherwise permitted by law. These terms do not grant you the right to use any branding or logos used in the Services. Don’t remove, obscure, or alter any legal notices displayed in or along with the Services.
    Billing and Payment

    The Services aren’t free, so we do need the following commitments from you if you are the user of an individual account or the Owner of a Group Plan with multiple accounts:

    You agree to pay all applicable charges for the Services you use, whether ordered by you, someone authorized by you, or someone with access to your Services or accounts.

    You agree to pay recurring monthly charges in advance of the billing cycle in which you will receive the Services. We will bill one-time charges in the billing cycle following your authorization of such charges.

    You authorize us to automatically collect payments of all charges associated with use of the Services from your designated payment method. Along with your bill, we will notify you of the date that the amount you owe will be collected via your designated payment method. We will send all bills and other required notices by email to the address associated with your account. We may also make them available in your account via the Google Fi Website or the Google Fi Application. Bills are typically emailed or otherwise made available to you one to two days after the end of your billing cycle. We reserve the right to amend or correct any bill within 180 days following the date we issue that bill.

    If payment is not received due to insufficient funds or for any other reason, we may, consistent with applicable laws, assess late payment fees, suspend, and/or limit the Services. To bring your accounts back into good standing, you will be required to pay all outstanding amounts for your services that are due and unpaid. We may also terminate your accounts. If we terminate your accounts, any unused services will be forfeited. We reserve the right to send unpaid bills to third party collection agencies.

    You must have a valid Google Payments account and use Google Payments for payment transactions relating to the Services. If you do not already have a Google Payments account at the time that you sign up for the Services, you will be required to create one. Please be aware that your use of Google Payments is subject to its Terms of Service and Privacy Policy (which incorporates the Google Privacy Policy by reference), to which you must agree to utilize Google Payments’s services. Google Fi is not responsible for any third party charges you may incur in connection with your Google Payments account, credit card, or other payment method.

    Please see the Subscription Information to learn more about usage fees, billing cycles, disputing your bill, and other information about managing your Google Fi accounts.
    Important Information about 911 and Emergency Alerts

    Calling 911. When making calls to a public-safety answering point (PSAP) from a mobile device, such as dialing 911, you should always be prepared to provide your location and your phone number. Unlike calls from a traditional wireline phone, a PSAP may not know the emergency caller’s location or phone number. Although some local emergency authorities have enabled enhanced 911 services (“E911” or “Enhanced 911”) that use Global Positioning Satellites (“GPS”) or other methods to determine callers’ locations, E911 does not always provide accurate location information. If your mobile device is indoors, cannot acquire a satellite signal, or otherwise cannot obtain your location, your location may not be automatically delivered to the PSAP. Also, the process of porting a phone number may limit the Services such that we may not be able to provide location services to PSAP during that time.

    Calls to 911 over Wi-Fi or a data connection also operate differently than traditional wireline calls to 911. Calls to 911 over Wi-Fi or data may not connect to the PSAP or may improperly ring to the administrative line of the PSAP, which may not be staffed after hours, or by trained 911 operators. If your call connects to a PSAP, your location information and phone number may not be transmitted, and you may need to provide your location and other information to the PSAP. Calls to 911 may be limited or unavailable if your device is set to Wi-Fi only mode and you are experiencing a power outage, any disruption in your Wi-Fi service, or if you are otherwise unable to access the Internet. If you would like to print a warning label for your device about the limitations of this service, you can view and print one here.

    If you are deaf, hard of hearing, or speech disabled and need to reach emergency services, call 911 directly using TTY or a telecommunications relay service. Where possible, do not rely on 711 in the event of an emergency.

    If you have multiple devices associated with your Google Fi number and you make an emergency call to 911, any calls back to you from the PSAP may ring each of your associated devices.

    Please be aware that, in providing you the Services, we may assign your device other phone numbers in addition to your personal phone number. If you make a 911 call, the 911 operator may see a phone number that is different from your personal phone number. There may be instances when the PSAP might not be able to call you back.

    Place of Primary Use. In order to use the Services, you are required to register a physical address with us that may be used to route emergency calls and services if your location isn’t immediately known. This address should be the place where you expect to primarily use the Services. It is important that you review and update this address as needed. For Group Plans, this address is initially set from the Owner’s address for all users by default, but you should update this address if your primary place of use is different. You can update this address at any time on the Google Fi Website or Google Fi Application. You will have to log into your Google Fi account in order to make changes. We will not accept P.O. Box addresses. Learn more about updating your place of primary use address here. You may also reach out to customer support.

    Text-to-911. Text-to-911 is the ability to send a text message to reach PSAPs from your mobile phone or device. Currently, the Services do not support text-to-911 sent over a Wi-Fi network. If your device is set to Wi-Fi only mode, you cannot reach PSAPs by sending a text message. In the event of an emergency, you should make a voice call (or TTY) to 911 when possible.

    Emergency Alerts. Emergency alerts can be enabled or disabled in your device settings. Even if enabled, Cell Broadcast, Emergency Alert System, and Wireless Priority Services messages are not always able to be sent to your device. Be aware that your device may not receive these messages if your device is set to Wi-Fi only mode or no cellular signal is available. If you set the device volume to low or vibrate only, your device may receive these messages but you may not receive an alert sound.

    Emergency Services Outside the United States. When you are traveling outside the United States, you may not be able to reach PSAPs by dialing 911. Where possible, we will attempt to reroute 911 calls to emergency services located in the country from which you are calling. Emergency calling is not available in all countries and may not be reliable where it is available.
    Coverage and Quality of Services

    Our coverage maps only approximate our anticipated wireless coverage area outdoors under optimal conditions. The actual service area, coverage, speed, and quality of service may fluctuate based on numerous factors such as signal strength, network congestion or capacity, hardware limitations, software, server speeds of the websites, portals or other locations on the Internet that you use, the weather and any other factors that are beyond our control. Outages and interruptions in the Services may occur, and Services, including calls or attempted calls to emergency services like 911 calls, may be interrupted or fail. The Services that rely on location information, such as E911 or GPS navigation, may depend on network coverage and may depend on your device’s ability to acquire satellite signals (typically not available indoors) or cell antenna sites. We do not warrant or guarantee that the Services will be available at any specific time or geographic location or that the Services will be provided without interruption or at any particular quality level. As we improve the Services, coverage maps may change over time.
    Network Management

    We are committed to providing an excellent user experience that supports any lawful product, service, or application that its subscribers choose to access through the Services. To do so, we engage in reasonable network management practices. Please see the Network Policy for more information about those network management practices.
    Privacy

    We take your privacy seriously. You understand and agree that information provided to and collected by Google Fi in connection with the Services is subject to the Google Privacy Policy and the Google Fi Privacy Notice. The Google Fi Privacy Notice provides information about how we use your data and your Customer Proprietary Network Information rights. To learn about the steps that Google Fi takes to protect your information, please see the main Google Privacy Policy.
    Keeping Your Account Secure

    The security of your Google Fi account depends on you keeping your Google Account password confidential and securing access to your device connected to your account. It is your responsibility to control access to your device and your account, including enabling a lock screen on your device and keeping your passwords confidential. If you share your account information or device with a third party, he or she may have access to your account and your personal information. It is also your responsibility to alert us if you believe that the security of the information in your account has been compromised.
    About Data Services & Data Content

    The Services may display or allow you to access third party content, such as text, pictures, video, games, graphics, music, email, applications, sound, and other materials ("Data Content") or send Data Content elsewhere. Data Content may be: (1) unsuitable for children/minors; (2) unreliable or inaccurate; or (3) offensive, indecent, or objectionable. You’re solely responsible for evaluating the Data Content accessed by you or anyone through your Services. Data Content may also harm your device or its software. We are not responsible for any Data Content. Data Content is the sole responsibility of the entity that makes it available. We may review Data Content to determine whether it is illegal or violates our policies, and we may remove or refuse to display Data Content that we reasonably believe violates our policies or the law. But that does not necessarily mean that we review content, so please don’t assume that we do.
    Modifying the Terms and Service Plans

    We may modify these Terms and any additional terms that apply to the Services to, for example, reflect changes to the law or changes to the Services. We will post the changes on the Google Fi Website. We will provide you with notice of material changes and may provide you notice of non-material changes. Changes will not apply retroactively and will become effective no sooner than fourteen (14) days after they are posted on the Google Fi Website or otherwise made available to you, except that changes addressing new functions for a Service or changes made for legal reasons will be effective immediately. If you are unhappy with any change we make, you may cancel your Services at any time.
    Cancelling Your Services

    You may cancel the Services at any time. If you are the user of an individual account or the Owner of a Group Plan with multiple accounts, in the event of cancellation, you agree to pay the balance of any outstanding charges remaining at time of cancellation. You also agree to pay any additional bill that we provide you after cancellation for charges you incurred while your Google Fi accounts were active, but that had not yet been billed to your accounts at the time of cancellation. If your accounts are in good standing, we will provide you a prorated refund for unused Services. Learn how to cancel your Services here.
    Our Warranties and Disclaimers

    We provide the Services using a commercially reasonable level of skill and care and we hope that you will enjoy using them. But there are certain things that we do not promise about our Services.

    OTHER THAN AS EXPRESSLY SET OUT IN THE TERMS OR IN A SEPARATE AGREEMENT PROVIDED TO YOU BY Google Fi OR AN AGENT THEREOF, NEITHER Google Fi NOR ITS SUPPLIERS OR DISTRIBUTORS MAKE ANY SPECIFIC PROMISES ABOUT THE SERVICES PROVIDED TO YOU BY Google Fi, ITS DISTRIBUTORS, OR SUPPLIERS. FOR EXAMPLE, WE DON’T MAKE ANY COMMITMENTS ABOUT THE CONTENT WITHIN THE SERVICES, THE SPECIFIC FUNCTION OF THE SERVICES, OR THEIR RELIABILITY, AVAILABILITY, OR ABILITY TO MEET YOUR NEEDS. WE PROVIDE THE SERVICES AND EQUIPMENT “AS IS.” SOME JURISDICTIONS PROVIDE FOR CERTAIN WARRANTIES, LIKE THE IMPLIED WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, WE EXCLUDE ALL WARRANTIES.
    Liability for the Services

    You agree that neither we nor our affiliates, agents, employees, representatives, vendors, suppliers, licensors, or distributors are responsible for any damages resulting from any of the following:

        Anything done or not done by someone else;
        Providing or failing to provide the Services, including, but not limited to, deficiencies or problems with a device or network coverage (for example, dropped blocked, interrupted services, etc.);
        Traffic or other accidents, or any health-related claims relating to the Services;
        Data content or information accessed while using the Services;
        An interruption or failure in accessing or attempting to access emergency services from a device, including through 911, Enhanced 911 or otherwise;
        Interrupted, failed, or inaccurate location information services;
        Information or communication that is blocked by a spam filter;
        Unauthorized interception of your communications by a third party;
        Damage to your mobile device or any computer or equipment connected to your mobile device, or damage to or loss of any information stored on your device, computer or equipment from your use of the Services or from viruses, worms, or downloads of malicious content, materials, data, text, images, video or audio;
        Incompatibilities with services, applications or accessories; or
        Things beyond our control, including acts of God (for example, weather-related phenomena, fire, earthquake, hurricane, etc.), riot, strike, war, terrorism or government orders or acts (collectively, “Force Majeure Events”).

    WHEN PERMITTED BY LAW, Google Fi AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND DISTRIBUTORS WILL NOT BE RESPONSIBLE FOR LOST PROFITS, REVENUES, OR DATA, FINANCIAL LOSSES OR INDIRECT, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES.

    TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF Google Fi FOR ANY CLAIMS UNDER THESE TERMS, INCLUDING FOR ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES, IS LIMITED TO THE AMOUNT YOU PAID US TO USE THE SERVICES, AND THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF OUR SUPPLIERS AND DISTRIBUTORS IS $0.

    IN ALL CASES, Google Fi AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND DISTRIBUTORS, WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY LOSS OR DAMAGE THAT IS NOT REASONABLY FORESEEABLE.
    Indemnification

    If you are using the Services on behalf of a business, that business accepts these terms. It will hold harmless and indemnify Google Fi and its affiliates, officers, agents, and employees from any claim, suit or action arising from or related to the use of the Services or violation of these terms, by any person under its account(s), including any liability or expense arising from claims, losses, damages, suits, judgments, litigation costs and attorneys’ fees.
    About these Terms

    These terms control the relationship between Google Fi and you. They do not create any third party beneficiary rights.

    If you do not comply with these terms, and we don’t take action right away, this doesn’t mean that we are giving up any rights that we may have (such as taking action in the future).

    If it turns out that a particular term is not enforceable, this will not affect any other terms.

    The laws of California, U.S.A., excluding California’s conflict of laws rules, will apply to any disputes arising out of or relating to these terms or the Services. All claims arising out of or relating to these terms or the Services will be litigated exclusively in the federal or state courts of Santa Clara County, California, USA, and you and Google Fi consent to personal jurisdiction in those courts.


    We may be required to provide certain disclosures, notices and communications (collectively “Communications”) to you in written form. Pursuant to this Electronic Communications Policy, (the “Policy”) we will deliver such Communications to you in electronic form. Your agreement to this Policy confirms your ability and consent to receive such Communications electronically, rather than in paper form.

    You agree and consent to receive electronically all Communications that we may provide you in connection with your Google Fi account and your use of the Services. Communications include:

        agreements and policies related to the Services, including updates to those agreements and policies;
        payment authorizations and transaction receipts or confirmations;
        account statements and history; and
        all other communications or documents related to or about your account, your purchases, and your use of the Services.

    Communications shall be deemed to be received by you upon delivery in any of the following manners:

        posting them to your online account;
        posting them on or in the Google Fi Website and Google Fi Application;
        emailing them to the email address associated with your account;
        communicating them to you via text message; or
        otherwise communicating them to you via the Services.

    In order to access and retain electronic Communications, you will need to maintain or have access to the following computer hardware and software at your own expense:

        a computer or mobile device with Internet or mobile connectivity;
        a current web browser that includes 128-bit encryption (e.g. Internet Explorer version 6.0 and above, Firefox version 2.0 and above, Chrome version 3.0 and above, or Safari 3.0 and above) with cookies enabled;
        software capable of opening documents in PDF format;
        access to the valid email address you used to create your Google Fi and Google Payments account registrations; and,
        sufficient storage space to save past Communications or a printer to print them.

    By consenting to this Policy, you confirm that you are able to meet the above requirements, and that you can receive, open, and print or save any Communications for your records. You should maintain copies of electronic Communications by printing paper copies or saving electronic copies, as applicable. Also, you may contact Google Fi to request another electronic copy of a Communication. We reserve the right to terminate your use of the Services if you decline or withdraw consent to receive electronic Communications.


Customer Proprietary Network Information

We take protecting your Customer Proprietary Network Information or “CPNI” very seriously.In fact, federal law requires telecommunications providers, like Google Fi, to protect certain personal information that we generate or access in providing the Services to you. CPNI includes call details, call location information, and information about the rates and features of the Services that you use. CPNI does not include your name, address, or phone number.

Here are the ways we protect your CPNI:

    Securing your CPNI. We implement safeguards that are designed to protect your CPNI. We must authenticate you with a password or other permissible means before we disclose any CPNI.
    Using CPNI without your additional approval is limited to specific purposes. By using the Services, you allow us to use, disclose, and permit access to your CPNI without your additional approval only for the following limited purposes:
        To provide and offer services among the category of Services you’re purchasing from us. This includes using CPNI in the normal course of business, such as to enable billing, customer service, and troubleshooting. This also includes related features such as call blocking, call return, repeat dialing, call waiting, caller ID, and call forwarding.
        To provide information services, such as Internet access and voicemail.
        To protect our rights and property.
        To protect our users and other carriers from fraudulent, abusive, or unlawful uses of the Services.
        Comply with applicable laws and legal process.
        Any other purpose permitted by federal law.
    Using CPNI after you choose to opt-in (by default you are opted out). From time to time, we may want to provide you information about Google communications-related services that are not among the category of services that you’re already purchasing from us. You can opt in to receiving this information. You are not required to opt in and your decision not to opt in will not adversely affect how we provide you the Services that you’re purchasing from us. Only if you opt in may we use your CPNI to market you Google communications-related services and share your CPNI with our affiliates and agents in order to provide you those services. Once you opt in, that opt in remains in effect until you affirmatively revoke your opt in or cancel the Services. Learn more about how to manage your opt-in here.
    Using CPNI with your additional approval. Except as provided above, we will not use, disclose, or permit access to your CPNI without your additional approval.

Information we collect

In providing the Services to you, we may collect other information in addition to CPNI.However, our use of that information is also limited to specific purposes related to the Services. We may collect information listed in the Google Privacy Policy as well as information related to the Services such as:

Account information. You may be asked to provide additional personal information, such as billing address, service address, or location. Also, in order to prevent unauthorized access to your account, we may require you to provide an email address, account password, and answers to security questions associated with your account before providing information to you about your account. In some cases, we may ask you to provide additional information to verify your identity.

Network and Device Information. We may collect information about your use of your mobile devices, our network, and the Services. This information includes:

    Usage Information. In providing Services to you, we maintain information about your calls, texts, and data usage, connectivity status, and information about the quantity, technical configuration, and type of the Services you use, as well as some other information found on your bill.
    Device Performance Information. We may collect information about the performance of the devices you use with the Services, such as any failure of the device to connect with our network, dropped calls, and battery usage.
    Location Data. When your device is turned on or when you use the Services, we may collect and process information about your actual location. This may include information about your current activity (e.g., driving, running, walking, etc.), which lets us know when you may be moving between different mobile and Wi-Fi networks.
    Wi-Fi Access. We may collect information about your usage of Wi-Fi services, the Wi-Fi networks that you use, and Wi-Fi networks that may be available to you. This may include information about the credentials you use to connect to Wi-Fi networks.

Pay Monthly Device Plan Information. When you apply to purchase a device on the Pay Monthly Device Plan, we may collect information you provide us in connection with that application, such as your name, address, date of birth, Social Security number, or other information. We may ask you to send us additional information or to answer additional questions to help verify your identity. We may obtain information about you from a credit bureau or other data broker to determine if you meet our minimum requirements to qualify for the Pay Monthly Device Plan.

Marketing Information. We may obtain and use information (such as commercially available demographic, geographic, or interest information) about our users from outside sources for the purposes of marketing Google Fi.
How we use the information we collect

In addition to the uses listed in the Google Privacy Policy, we use the information we collect to:

    Provide you the Services and enable your purchase of devices.
    Manage your access to the mobile networks and Wi-Fi networks available to you.
    Bill you and collect payment for the Services and devices that you purchased.
    Help you troubleshoot any issues you are experiencing with the Services, your device purchases, or your account.
    Verify your identity.
    Protect you or Google from fraud, phishing, or other misconduct.
    Send you information about the Services and the Pay Monthly Device Plan and offer you additional Google or Google Fi products and services in compliance with our obligations to protect your CPNI.
    If you apply to purchase a device under the Pay Monthly Device Plan, we review your information, including your credit information, to determine if you qualify for the Pay Monthly Device Plan.

How we share information
Sharing with third parties

We will only share your personal information with other companies or individuals outside of Google Fi and our affiliates in the following circumstances:

    As permitted under the Google Privacy Policy.
    We may provide personal information to our trusted businesses or persons to provide you the Services based on our instructions and in compliance with the Google Fi Privacy Notice and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures.
    If you applied to purchase a device on the Pay Monthly Device Plan, we may share certain information with a credit bureau or other data broker to obtain your credit information.

Sharing with our affiliates.

We share information with our affiliates, including Google LLC, to:

    Provide you the Services.
    Process your purchase of devices.
    Bill you and collect payment for the Services and devices that you purchased.
    Help you troubleshoot any issues you are experiencing with the Services, your device purchases, or your account.
    Verify your identity.
    Protect you or Google from fraud, phishing, or other misconduct.

A few things to keep in mind
Information you may be sharing when you make phone calls

When you place calls using the Services, your phone number may be displayed to the person you’ve called. If you do not wish to have your phone number displayed, you may choose to block the display of your phone number by dialing *67 prior to dialing the number of the person you wish to call. Blocking your phone number information in this manner does not prevent the display of your information when you dial certain business numbers, including 911 or toll-free numbers.
Information you may be sharing when you use the Internet

When you browse the Internet, use mobile applications, or otherwise access the Internet, the Mobile Directory Number (“MDN”) assigned to your mobile device and/or other device-specific information may be transmitted over the Internet. It is possible that third parties can use the MDN and other information to identify your device.

Google Fi Network Policy

    We are committed to providing an excellent user experience that supports any lawful product, service, or application that its subscribers choose to access through the Services. To do so, Google Fi engages in reasonable network management practices. This Network Policy generally describes our network management practices and is subject to change at any time.
    Network Management

    We use various network management techniques to protect our network, systems, equipment, services and users from harm, ensure reliable, quality services to our users, and improve our services. These network management practices can include:

        Using automated systems to analyze network traffic to detect and prevent the distribution of spam and malware.
        Allocating network resources amongst users and devices in manner that promotes the best experience for users.
        Limiting or suspending heavy, continuous data usage that adversely impacts our network’s performance or hinders access to our network. For example, we may automatically terminate any call that exceeds two hours in duration.
        Limiting or suspending usage that we reasonably suspect is unlawful, fraudulent, or does not comply with the Acceptable Use Policy.
        Restricting access to any telephone number and/or certain categories of telephone numbers (e.g., 9XX numbers other than 911), certain websites, portals, or any messages or content.
        Not providing calling capability, including connections to certain geographic locations and special services numbers.
        Limiting data speeds of users who use an excessive amount of data.

    To provide the Services, we also rely on networks, systems, equipment, and services provided by our suppliers. Our suppliers may also engage in their own network management techniques to protect their networks, systems, equipment, and services from harm, and such network management can impact the Services.
    Roaming

    We may choose to allow users to roam (receive service from other networks) in our sole discretion. Whether we allow roaming depends on a number of factors, including the radio transmissions that devices can receive. We make no guarantee that roaming coverage will be available, and we are not responsible for roaming networks. Depending on your mobile device settings, you may automatically roam if there is a gap or interruption in coverage within our network area and roaming coverage areas. Limits on the amount of minutes, number of texts, and amount or speed of data services used while roaming may be applied. Certain Services or features may not be available in roaming coverage areas, and call quality may be lower while roaming. Google Fi reserves the right to deny roaming to any device at any time.
    Device Management

    You may only use the Services with supported devices. A supported device is a device that conforms to all the following requirements:

        does not potentially harm the Services, our network, or our suppliers’ networks;
        complies with Federal Communications Commission regulations;
        utilizes an operating system supported by Services; and
        is certified by us for use on our network.

    We will list supported devices on the Google Fi Website. Not all supported devices are the same, and the Services may perform differently on different devices. Also, some Services may not be available on all supported devices and operating systems, and some features will be available only on devices purchased from us. Modifications or customizations to your operating system could impact the performance or availability of the Services.

    We reserve the right to suspend any device that we reasonably determine is unsupported.Using an unsupported device may enable you to use third party services while roaming outside our network. If you use such third party services, you are responsible for all third party charges that you incur, and we may pass those charges to you as part of your bill. Third party charges may be substantially higher than the usage fees we charge for use of the Services within our network.

    We do not allow stolen devices to use the Services and reserve the right to deny providing services to any device that has been reported stolen or that we reasonably believe may be stolen.
    Telephone Numbers and IP Address

    When you sign up for the Services, we may assign you a personal phone number (the "Personal Number"). We can change, reassign, or eliminate your Personal Number by giving you notice. We may also assign an Internet Protocol address ("IP Address") to your wireless device and can change, reassign, or eliminate your IP Address without giving you notice. You may not assign the Personal Number or IP Address to any wireless device, other equipment or to any other party except as approved by us.

    In addition to your Personal Number, we may assign your device other phone numbers (each an “Additional Phone Number”). We use these Additional Phone Numbers to operate and manage the Services, and they may not be made apparent to you. We can change, reassign, or eliminate any Additional Phone Number at any time in our discretion without giving you notice.

    You may port your Personal Number to another carrier at any time while your Google Fi account is still active. Please be aware that, once the Personal Number for any device has been ported out, it will no longer be able to use the Services. Consequently, we may treat any request to transfer a Personal Number to another carrier as a request for cancellation. We don’t guarantee that any porting of numbers to or from us will be successful.
    Software Updates

    In order to provide you the Services, we provide you software on your device. We may automatically update that software on your device once a new version or feature is available. These changes could affect your stored data or how you have programmed or use your wireless device.

    Google Fi gives you a personal, worldwide, royalty-free, non-assignable and non-exclusive license to use the software provided to you by us as part of the Services. This license is for the sole purpose of enabling you to use and enjoy the benefit of the Services as provided by Google Fi, in the manner permitted by these terms. You may not copy, modify, distribute, sell, or lease any part of our Services or included software, nor may you reverse engineer or attempt to extract the source code of that software, unless laws prohibit those restrictions or you have our written permission.

    Open source software is important to us. Some software used in the Services may be offered under an open source license that we will make available to you. There may be provisions in the open source license that expressly override some of these terms.
    Suspected Fraud

    In certain circumstances, a supplier on which we rely may terminate your Services immediately if that supplier detects fraud. In such circumstances, we do not have control over the termination but will work with you to restore Services if you believe it was done in error. If we suspect fraudulent activity with any of the devices on your Google Fi account, we will notify you of the potential fraud. We may also suspend your device from using some or all of the Services.
    Information about Security

    We make an effort to keep our network secure, but no network’s security is perfect. You should be sure to take whatever steps you believe are necessary to ensure that your data is not accessed by unauthorized third parties. Please be aware of the following:

        Device Storage. Your device may contain sensitive or personal information. Google Fi is not responsible for any information on your device, including sensitive or personal information. You should remove or otherwise safeguard any sensitive or personal information when your device is out of your possession or control, including, but not limited to, relinquishing, exchanging, returning or recycling your device.
        Third-Party Applications. Use of applications or services provided, offered, and/or controlled by someone other than Google Fi (“Third Party Applications”) is not governed by these Terms and may be subject to separate agreement between you and the third party provider. Third Party Applications may access, collect, use or disclose your personal information, including location information, as a result of your agreement to the installation and use of those applications. Google Fi has no responsibility for Third Party Applications.
        Unauthorized Interception. Although it may be illegal for unauthorized people to intercept wireless device calls intended for others, Google Fi cannot guarantee the complete privacy of your calls. Wireless calls by nature may be intercepted by third parties. Google Fi SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR TO ANY THIRD PARTY FOR ANY INTERCEPTION BY THIRD PARTIES OF COMMUNICATIONS FROM ITS SYSTEM.

    Copyright Issues

    We respond to notices of alleged copyright infringement according to the process set out in the U.S. Digital Millennium Copyright Act. If you think somebody is violating your copyrights and want to notify us, you can find information about submitting notices here.


    Overview of the Services

    Descriptions of the Services are provided below. As we are constantly changing and improving our Services, we may add or remove functionalities or features, and we may suspend or stop a Service altogether at any time, in our sole discretion. We believe that you own your data and preserving your access to such data is important. If we discontinue a Service, where reasonably possible, we will give you reasonable advance notice and a chance to get information out of that Service. All Services are subject to our network management practices. Please note that the features of the Services may not be the same as the features of the services offered by our suppliers.

    Calls & texts. Calls & texts are available for a recurring flat monthly fee and provides the following:

        Unlimited number of voice minutes within the United States.
        Unlimited Wi-Fi calling within the United States.
        Unlimited Wi-Fi calling to the United States when you travel in certain countries.
        Unlimited number of SMS and MMS texts within the United States and the 135+ Supported Countries.*
        24/7 Live Support.

    If you have multiple devices associated with your Google Fi number, your unlimited calling and texting capabilities may be limited to your calls & texts Device.
    *The 135+ Supported Countries are those countries where Google Fi makes its Services available for use when you are traveling in those countries. Over time, we may include additional countries within 135+ Supported Countries. We may also remove countries at any time. We provide a list of the 135+ Supported Countries on the Google Fi Website.

    Data Usage. Data usage includes web browsing, application usage, downloading content (like applications, games, etc.), ringtones and similar activities. If applications running in the background use your data connection, such usage will be accounted as part of your data usage. Data usage is available to you as follows:

    We will charge you for data you have used in 1 MB increments. With Bill Protection, we will not charge you for data usage beyond certain amounts, which depend on the number of users in your plan. Users who exceed a specified amount of data usage (across all their devices) will have their data speeds slowed for the remainder of their billing cycle, unless they opt out and choose to be charged for additional data usage. For data usage in countries other than the United States, you will be charged for data you use on per MB basis. The applicable rate per MB may vary by country. Charges will appear in the international section of your bill.

    International Calling. Wi-Fi calling to the United States is included as part of calls & texts without an additional fee. All other calls between two different countries (such as cellular calls placed between the United States and another country and Wi-Fi calls between non-US countries) will be charged on a rate per minute basis. Calls will be rounded up to the nearest minute. The applicable rates vary per country.
    About Usage Fees for Services

    We will provide information about our usage fees and rates on the Google Fi Website or the Google Fi Application. The details, prices, and allowances of the Services may change at any time. The type of fees that you incur will vary depending on the Services you choose to use.

    We charge three different types of usage fees for the Services:

    Monthly Recurring Fees. Some Services, like calls & texts, are available for a monthly recurring fee. For any Services with a recurring monthly fee, those fees must be paid in advance of the month in which you will receive the Services. If a monthly recurring fee for a Service that you have subscribed to is changed, the change will be effective at the next billing cycle, and you will receive notification of the pending change.

    One-Time Fees. Some Services, like calls from the United States to other countries, are available for a specific fee or rate per use. We will bill one-time charges in the next billing cycle following your authorization of such charges. There may be some instances, due to delay in our systems, where the charges appear in a later billing cycle.

    Additional Fees. Depending upon the Services used by you, there may be additional charges for calls to or from certain locations, including without limitation payphones and areas within extended calling zones. There may also be applicable charges for any special or enhanced services you use.
    About Taxes, Surcharges, and Other Fees

    In addition to usage fees, you agree to pay all applicable taxes, surcharges, and other fees.

    A Note about Surcharges. Surcharges are not taxes, and we are not required by law to assess them. We choose, in our discretion, to collect surcharges from you to recover certain costs. We determine the amount of each surcharge, and that amount is subject to change without notice, as are the components used to calculate that amount. Examples of surcharges include, but are not limited to, Federal and State Universal Service fees, and regulatory and administrative fees.
    Managing Your Google Fi Account

    Billing Cycles. If you are the user of an individual account or the Owner of a Group Plan with multiple accounts, when you first establish your Google Fi account, you will approve your initial purchase of calls & texts and authorize automatic monthly charges via Google Payments. Your billing cycle for all subsequent months will commence on the day that you activate the first device on your Google Fi account (the “Cycle Start Day”), except that if the activation of the first device on your account occurs on the 1st, 28th, 29th, 30th, or 31st of any month, your Cycle Start Day will be the 2nd of all subsequent months. For example, if the activation of the first device on your account occurs on March 28, 29, 30, 31 or April 1, your next Cycle Start Day will be May 2nd. Subsequent monthly billing cycles will automatically renew on the Cycle Start Day of each subsequent month.

    Disputing Charges. If you believe you were incorrectly charged by us, you must dispute those charges in writing within 180 days of the date we charge your account. You accept all charges not properly disputed within the above time period.

    Lost or Stolen Devices. If your device is lost or stolen, notify us immediately by calling customer support. We reserve the right to hold you liable for all charges and fees incurred by your device until you have notified us of the alleged loss or theft and until such time as we can deactivate the device. If we choose to investigate a lost or stolen device, you agree to cooperate in our investigation. Once a device is reasonably determined to be lost or stolen, we may report the device to third party services that track lost or stolen devices and prevent service from being activated on the device.
    Suspension and Termination of Your Google Fi Account

    In certain circumstances, we may suspend or terminate your Google Fi account in accordance with these Terms. For example, we may suspend or terminate your account if there is a late payment, suspected fraud, or we determine there is a violation of these Terms. We may also suspend or terminate your account if your Google Account or Google Payments account is suspended or terminated. If your Google Fi account is suspended for any reason, you cannot make use of the Services for any purpose except for placing calls to emergency services. When your account is terminated, all devices will be disassociated from your account and may permanently lose the current telephone numbers associated with such devices. Even if you later bring your account into good standing, we will likely not be able to provide you with the telephone numbers that were associated with your devices prior to when your account was terminated.

--------------------------


G Suite for Education Privacy Notice

This Privacy Notice is meant to help G Suite for Education users and parents understand what data we collect, why we collect it, and what we do with it. This Notice includes information about our privacy practices that are specific to G Suite for Education and summarizes the most relevant portions of the Google Privacy Policy, which provides additional examples and explanations that may be useful. We hope you will take the time to read this Notice and the Google Privacy Policy, which both apply to G Suite for Education accounts.
Information we collect

A G Suite for Education account is a Google Account created and managed by a school for use by students and educators. When creating this account, the school may provide Google with certain personal information about its students and educators, which includes a user’s name, email address, and password in most cases, but could also include secondary email, phone, and address if the school chooses to provide that information. Google may also collect personal information directly from users of G Suite for Education accounts, such as telephone number, profile photo or other information they add to a G Suite for Education account.

Google also collects information based on the use of our services. This includes:

    device information, such as the hardware model, operating system version, unique device identifiers, and mobile network information including phone number of the user;
    log information, including details of how a user used our service, device event information, and the user's Internet protocol (IP) address;
    location information, as determined by various technologies including IP address, GPS, and other sensors;
    unique application numbers, such as application version number; and
    cookies or similar technologies which are used to collect and store information about a browser or device, such as preferred language and other settings.

How we use information we collect

    In G Suite for Education Core Services
    The G Suite for Education Core Services (“Core Services”) are listed in the Services Summary and include Gmail, Calendar, Classroom, Contacts, Drive, Docs, Forms, Groups, Sheets, Sites, Slides, Talk/Hangouts, Vault, and Chrome Sync. These services are provided to a school under its G Suite for Education agreement and, as applicable, Data Processing Amendment. (Users and parents can ask their school if it has accepted the Data Processing Amendment.)
    User personal information collected in the Core Services is used only to provide the Core Services. Google does not serve ads in the Core Services or use personal information collected in the Core Services for advertising purposes.
    In Google services generally
    Besides the Core Services, G Suite for Education users may have access to other Google services that we make generally available for consumers, such as Google Maps, Blogger, and YouTube. We call these “Additional Services” since they are outside of the Core Services.
    The Google Privacy Policy describes fully how Google services generally use information, including for G Suite for Education users. To summarize, we use the information we collect from all of our services to provide, maintain, protect and improve them, to develop new ones, and to protect Google and our users. We also use this information to offer users tailored content, such as more relevant search results. We may combine personal information from one service with information, including personal information, from other Google services.
    Google may serve ads to G Suite for Education users in the Additional Services. For G Suite for Education users in primary and secondary (K-12) schools, Google does not use any user personal information (or any information associated with a G Suite for Education Account) to target ads, whether in Core Services or other Google services accessed while using a G Suite for Education account.

Learn more about Core and Additional Services for G Suite for Education users.
Information users share

A school may allow students to access Google services such as Google Docs and Sites, which include features where users can share information with others or publicly. When users share information publicly, it may be indexable by search engines, including Google. Our services provide users with various options for sharing and removing content.
Information we share

Information we collect may be shared outside of Google in limited circumstances. We do not share personal information with companies, organizations and individuals outside of Google unless one of the following circumstances applies:

    With user consent. We will share personal information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of Google when we have user consent or parents’ consent (as applicable).
    With G Suite for Education administrators. G Suite for Education administrators have access to information stored in the Google Accounts of users in that school or domain.
    For external processing. We provide personal information to our affiliates or other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures.
    For legal reasons. We will share personal information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:

    meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
    enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
    detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues.
    protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users or the public as required or permitted by law.

We may share non-personal information publicly and with our partners – like publishers or connected sites. For example, we may share information publicly to show trends about the general use of our services.
Transparency and choice

We provide a variety of user controls that enable G Suite for Education users to make meaningful choices about how information is used in Google services. Depending on the settings enabled by the school, users can use the various controls described in the Privacy Policy, such as Google activity controls, to manage their privacy and information. We provide additional information for parents, students, and administrators on the G Suite for Education Privacy Center.
Parental review and deletion of information

The parents of G Suite for Education users in Primary/Secondary (K-12) schools can access their child’s personal information or request that it be deleted through the school administrator. School administrators can provide for parental access and deletion of personal information consistent with the functionality of our services. If a parent wishes to stop any further collection or use of the child's information, the parent can request that the administrator use the service controls available to them to limit the child’s access to features or services, or delete the child’s account entirely. Guidance for administrators on how to use service controls to accomplish this is available in the G Suite Help Center.
Interpretation of conflicting terms

This Notice is intended to provide the key information about our collection and use of data for G Suite for Education users, and is consistent with the Google Privacy Policy and the G Suite for Education agreement, which provide additional examples and explanations that may be useful. Where there are terms that differ, as with the limitations on advertising in G Suite for Education, the G Suite for Education agreement (as amended) takes precedence, followed by this Privacy Notice and then the Google Privacy Policy.
Contact us

If you have questions about management of G Suite for Education accounts or use of personal information by a school, please contact the G Suite for Education account administrator. If you have questions about our practices, please visit the G Suite for Education Privacy Center. Also see our Privacy Troubleshooter for more questions about privacy and Google’s products and services. G Suite for Education administrators can contact Google about the information in this Notice by submitting the contact form while signed in to their administrator account. Parents can also contact Google about the information in this Notice.

Google

1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043 USA

Phone: +1 650-253-0000
--------------------



This YouTube Kids Privacy Notice is intended to help parents understand what data is collected by the app, why we collect it, what we do with it, and our privacy controls. This Notice provides information about our privacy practices that are specific to YouTube Kids and summarizes the most relevant portions of the Google Privacy Policy, which generally describes how we treat user information in Google's products and services.
Information we collect

YouTube Kids collects information based on your children's use of the app, like when they watch a video. This information includes:

    device information, such as hardware model, operating system version, and unique device identifiers;
    log information, including details of how our service is used, device event information, and the device's Internet protocol (IP) address;
    unique application numbers, such as application version number; and
    mobile identifiers, which are a technology similar to cookies used to collect and store information about an app or device, such as preferred language, watch and search history, and other settings.

YouTube Kids doesn't collect personal information like name, address, or contact information from your children.
How we use information we collect

We use the information we collect for internal operational purposes such as for spam and abuse prevention and enforcing our content license restrictions, determining preferred language and providing and improving the service.

We also use this information to offer users personalized content. We associate a mobile identifier that's unique to the app with the videos your children have watched and terms they've searched for to recommend videos likely to be of interest to them, subject to the controls described below.

We use mobile identifiers to provide contextual advertising, including ad frequency capping, unless you enable YouTube Premium, which provides an experience free of paid ads, as described below. The app does not allow interest-based advertising or remarketing.

YouTube Kids does not allow your children to share personal information with third parties or make it publicly available.
Signing into YouTube Kids with your Google Account: Additional Information We Collect and How We Use It

In some countries we allow parents to sign into YouTube Kids with their Google Account to access and enable additional parental controls, customization and viewing preferences and use their YouTube Premium membership in the app.

If available, when you sign into YouTube Kids with your Google Account, the app will collect your Google Account information, such as email address and password, and where available, will collect information associated to parental controls, customization, and viewing preferences that you may have enabled in the app. These may include lists of video blocked from the app, videos you add to the app, information contained on limited profiles you may enable for your children (such as name, month and year of birth, picture, videos your children mark as like or disliked and channels they may subscribe to and watch and search history specific to each child), in addition to the information described above. We will use this information to provide certain additional features, including:

    Give you access to and enable additional parental controls, customization, and viewing preferences, in the app on all your devices. These may include adding or blocking certain videos from the app, the creation of limited profiles for your children, the ability for your children to mark videos that they like or dislike and to subscribe to certain channels.
    If applicable, enabling YouTube Premium benefits, such as offline access to content, background play and no paid ads, in the YouTube Kids app on all your devices.

When you sign in with your Google account, we will use the watch and search history tied to each specific installation of the app to recommend videos on YouTube Kids, as described above, and we will continue to use that watch and search history to recommend videos even if you sign out of the app, unless they are cleared and paused in the settings section as described below.

If you are signed in and have limited profiles for your children associated with your Google Account, we will use the information tied to each restricted profile to offer each child personalized content by recommending videos likely to be of interest to them, subject to the controls described below.
Information we share

We will not disclose individual user information outside of Google unless one of the following circumstances applies:

    With consent
    We will share individual user information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of Google when we have parental consent.
    For legal reasons
    We will share individual user information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
        meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
        enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
        detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues.
        protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users or the public as required or permitted by law.
    For external processing
    We may provide individual user information to our affiliates or other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures.

We may share aggregate information about the use of the app with third parties to, for example, show trends about the use of the app or meet our reporting obligations with partners.
Parental Access and Controls

You can access the videos your children have recently watched in the Watch it again section of the app. You can pause the collection of watch and search history or clear the watch and search history in the parental settings section of the app. If you've enabled limited profiles for your children, you will be able pause and clear watch and search history, or turn on and off search for each child separately. While history is paused, the app will not use new video views or search terms to recommend videos. When watch and search history are cleared, the app resets Recommended and Watch it again videos. If Search is turned off, the app automatically clears watch and search history. Finally, you can always uninstall and reinstall the app on an device to reset the app-specific identifiers used to collect watch and search history, but if you have enabled children's limited profiles, watch and search history will remain linked to each profile until you specifically delete the history.

If you've signed-in, you'll be automatically signed into the YouTube Kids app installed on all the devices where your Google account is signed in. you can unlink your Google Account from a specific installation of the YouTube Kids app by following the prompts in the parental settings section of the app. You can also delete the parental controls, customization, and viewing preferences that are associated with your Google Account at any time by using the in-product tools we provide.
Interpretation of conflicting terms.

This Privacy Notice is generally consistent with the Google Privacy Policy. Where there are terms that differ, this Privacy Notice overrules the Google Privacy Policy.
Service Provider

The YouTube Kids service is provided by:

Google LLC

1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043 USA

Phone: +1 650-253-0000

In the EEA and Switzerland:

Google Ireland Limited

Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4

Republic of Ireland
Contact Us

Parents may contact us directly with any questions or concerns at:

youtubekids-privacy@google.com
Signing into YouTube Kids with your child's Google Account

In some countries, we offer Google accounts for children under the age of 13 and allow these children to sign into YouTube Kids with their Google account. The Privacy Notice for Google Accounts Created with Family Link describes our privacy practices when your child uses YouTube Kids with their Google Account. When your child uses YouTube Kids without signing into their Google account, the YouTube Kids Privacy Notice applies. Remember that when your child is signed into YouTube Kids with their Google account, the information we collect, including your child's search and watch history and recordings of their voice searches, may be stored with their Google account and used to improve your child's Google experience. To learn more about our privacy practices for your child's Google Account, please see the Privacy Notice for Google Accounts Created with Family Link and the Google Privacy Policy.

Dated: January 31, 2019

--------------------


Privacy Notice for Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country) (“Privacy Notice”)

We know it’s important for you to understand what personal information we collect in association with your child’s Google Account, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete that information. This Privacy Notice and the Google Privacy Policy explain our privacy practices for your child’s Google Account. To the extent there are terms that conflict, such as with respect to limitations on personalized advertising, this Privacy Notice controls.

This Privacy Notice does not apply to the practices of any third party (non-Google) apps, actions or websites that your child may use. You should review the applicable terms and policies for third party apps, actions, and sites to determine their appropriateness for your child, including their data collection and use practices.
Information We Collect

The Google Privacy Policy sets forth our information collection practices. For example, we collect:

Information you and your child create or provide to us.

As part of the account creation process, we ask for personal information like first and last name, email address, and birthdate.  We collect the content your child provides, such as your online contact information, which is necessary for us to contact you to request consent.  We also collect the information your child creates, uploads, or receives from others when using their account, such as when your child saves a picture in Google Photos or creates a document in Google Drive.

Information we get from your child’s use of our services.

We automatically collect and store certain information about the services your child uses and how your child uses them, like when your child enters a query in Google Search, talks to the Google Assistant, or watches a video on YouTube Kids. This information includes:

    Your child’s apps, browsers & devices

We collect information about the apps, browsers, and devices your child uses to access Google services, including unique identifiers, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your child’s apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including IP address, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and referrer URL of your child’s request. We collect this information when a Google service on your child’s device contacts our servers, for example, when they install an app from the Play Store.

    Your child’s activity

We collect information about your child’s activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend apps they might like on Google Play. Your child’s activity information that we collect may include things like search terms, videos they watch, voice and audio information when they use audio features, people with whom they communicate or share content, and Chrome browsing history they’ve synced with their Google Account. If your child uses our services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages, for example by using Google Hangouts, we may collect telephony log information like their phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types of calls. Your child can visit their Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in their account and you can also manage their activity information by signing in to your child’s Google Account.

    Your child’s location information

We collect information about your child’s location when they use our services. Your child’s location can be determined by using GPS, IP address, sensor data from their device, and information about things near their device, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices. The types of location data we collect depends in part on your child’s device and account settings. 

    Your child’s voice & audio information                                                                                                                                     

We may collect your child’s voice and audio information. For example, if your child uses audio activation commands (e.g., “OK, Google” or touching the microphone icon), a recording of the following speech/audio, plus a few seconds before, will be stored to their account from any of your child’s signed-in devices, when the Voice & Audio Activity setting is enabled.

We use various technologies to collect and store your child’s information, including cookies, pixel tags, local storage, such as browser web storage or application data caches, databases, and server logs.  We do not require your child to provide more personal information than is reasonably necessary to use the Google products and services available for these accounts.
How We Use Information We Collect

Google’s Privacy Policy explains in greater detail the purposes for which Google collects data in association with your child’s Google Account. In general, we use your child’s information: to provide, maintain, and improve our services; to develop new  services; to customize our services for your child; to measure performance and understand how our services are used; to communicate directly with your child in relation to our services; and to help improve the safety and reliability of our services.

 

We use different technologies to process your child’s information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your child’s content to provide them with things like customized search results or other features tailored to how they use our services. And we analyze your child’s content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use algorithms to recognize patterns in data. When we detect spam, malware, illegal content, and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable their account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.

 

We may use your child’s information to provide recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results. For example, depending on your child’s settings, Google Play may use information like apps your child has installed to suggest new apps they might like.

 

In addition, we may combine the information we collect among our services and across your child’s devices for the purposes described above. Depending on your child’s account settings, their activity on other sites and apps may be associated with their personal information in order to improve Google’s services.

 

Google will not serve personalized ads to your child, which means ads will not be based on information from your child’s account. Instead, ads may be based on information like the content of the website or app your child is viewing, the current search query, or general location (such as city or state). When browsing the web or using non-Google apps, your child may encounter ads served by other (non-Google) ad providers, including ads personalized by third parties.

Information Your Child Can Share

Your child will be able to share information, including photos, videos, audio, and location, publicly and with others, when signed in with their Google Account. When your child shares information publicly, it may be accessible through search engines like Google Search.

Information Google Shares

Information we collect may be shared outside of Google in limited circumstances. We do not share personal information with companies, organizations, and individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:

With consent
We will share personal information outside of Google with consent (as applicable).

With your family group

Your child’s information, including their name, photo, email address, and Play purchases, may be shared with members of your family group on Google.

For external processing

We provide personal information to our affiliates or other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with this Privacy Notice, the Google Privacy Policy, and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures.



For legal reasons

We will share personal information with companies, organizations or individuals outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:

    meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request;
    enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations;
    detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues; or
    protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users or the public as required or permitted by law.

We may also share non-personally identifiable information (such as trends about the general use of our services) publicly and with our partners  — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to show trends about the general use of our services. We also allow specific partners to collect information from browsers or devices for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.

If your child is signed into YouTube Kids with their Google Account, this Privacy Notice applies. If your child is not signed into YouTube Kids with their Google Account, the YouTube Kids Privacy Notice applies.
Access to Your Child’s Personal Information

If you created a new account for your child with Family Link, you can access, update, remove, and export your child’s information by signing into their Google Account. If you do not remember your child’s password, you can reset it through the Family Link app or Family Link settings on the web. Once signed in, you can use the various controls described in the Google Privacy Policy (such as Google activity controls) to manage your child’s privacy settings and information. If your child created their own account prior to the change of the minimum required age in your country, and you later granted permission for your child to keep their account, you will not have the ability to reset your child’s password or sign in to their account without their permission.  

By default, your child will have the ability to change their activity controls, delete their past activity in “My Activity,” and grant app permissions (including things like device location, microphone, or contacts) to third parties. However, you can limit your child’s ability to make these choices on Android without parental approval by going to Family Link settings (either in the app or on the web) and changing “Manage Google Activity” and “App Permissions” settings to “Only parents.”

You can also use the Family Link app or Family Link settings on the web to edit or modify your child’s Google Account information, review app activity and app permissions, and manage your child’s ability to grant certain permissions to apps to do things like access information from your child’s Android device (such as location, microphone, and contacts). You can also use Family Link to help manage your child’s access to certain features, apps, and services on Android, or change their Android permissions on devices running Android 6.0 and above.

If at any time you wish to stop further collection or use of your child's information, you can delete your child’s Google Account my clicking “Delete account” on your child’s Account Info page in Family Link or on the Family group page in My Account. Your child’s account information will be permanently deleted within a reasonable period of time.

When Your Child Can Manage Their Account on Their Own

When your child turns 13 (or the relevant age as determined by applicable law in your jurisdiction), they are eligible to manage their account on their own.  If your child chooses to manage their Google Account, you will no longer have access to, or be able to exercise control over their account, unless you and your child later choose to set up supervision again through Family Link. Before your child becomes eligible to manage their own Google Account, we will notify you and your child.

Contact Us

If you have any questions about your child’s Google Account, don’t hesitate to contact us. We’re here to help. You can find additional information about Family Link and your child’s Google Account in our help center. You can also send us feedback about Family Link or your child’s Google Account in the Family Link app by tapping Menu ☰ > Help & Feedback > Send feedback, or by contacting us by email or at the address below.



Google
1600 Amphitheatre Parkway
Mountain View, CA 94043 USA

Phone: +1 855 696 1131 (USA)
For other countries, visit g.co/ContactFamilyLinkHelp

If you have questions about how Google collects and uses your child’s data, you can contact Google and our data protection office. You can also contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.


